Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-1105
Order; form of benefit payment.

An alternate payee under a qualified domestic relations order shall receive the form of benefit payment specified in the order or, if not specified, selected by the alternate payee, if such form is a form available to the member and is not a joint and survivor annuity with the alternate payee's subsequent spouse.

Laws 1996, LB 1273, § 5.